Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Sales and Service Contracts.

Sec. 45.25.600.
Title transfer.

A motor vehicle dealer may not transfer the title for a motor vehicle to a buyer before all of the sale documents, including any finance contract arranged by the seller, are complete and executed in final form by all parties to the sale.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Sec. 45.25.610.
Sales contracts.

A motor vehicle sales contract must be in writing, signed by both the seller and buyer, and completed as to all essential provisions before the signing of the contract by the buyer and before delivery of the vehicle to the buyer.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 171 SLA 2004.]

If a motor vehicle dealer arranges financing for a buyer, the motor vehicle dealer may deliver the motor vehicle to the buyer before final approval by the financing entity if

the buyer and seller sign an agreement separate from the motor vehicle installment contract on an 8 1/2 x 11 inch sheet of paper that clearly and conspicuously informs the buyer that final financing arrangements have not yet been approved and that clearly sets out the amount that will be financed, the annual percentage rate of the finance charge, the amount of the finance charge, the number and frequency of payments, and the amount of each payment;

the separate agreement clearly and conspicuously informs the buyer that accepting delivery of the vehicle before final financing approval obligates the buyer to terms of the motor vehicle sales contract if the terms on the separate agreement are identical to the terms finally approved by the financing entity; and

the separate agreement provides that the motor vehicle sales contract will be void if any of the terms contained in the separate agreement are changed by either the motor vehicle dealer or the financing institution as a condition of sale or final financing approval.

If a buyer’s final financing is not approved and, as a result, the transaction is not completed, and if the motor vehicle dealer has delivered the motor vehicle to the buyer, the buyer shall deliver the motor vehicle to the motor vehicle dealer, the motor vehicle dealer shall return the buyer’s entire down payment less any amount owed to the motor vehicle dealer under (e) and (f) of this section, and the buyer’s trade-in, if any, shall be returned to the buyer in the same condition and with not more than 100 miles accumulated on the odometer from when the trade-in motor vehicle was delivered to the motor vehicle dealer.

If a buyer’s final financing is not approved and the buyer has made an intentional misrepresentation in a credit application or other financial statement provided by the buyer to the motor vehicle dealer or to a financing institution, the buyer shall reimburse the motor vehicle dealer for the buyer’s use of the motor vehicle that exceeds 100 miles over the odometer reading on the motor vehicle on the date of the initial delivery, at a rate that is the greater of

the business use mileage rate that is applied by the federal Internal Revenue Service at the time the motor vehicle is returned to the motor vehicle dealer; or

$.45 a mile.

If a buyer’s financing is not approved and the buyer has made an intentional misrepresentation as described in (e) of this section, the buyer is responsible for damage to the motor vehicle that occurred while the motor vehicle was in the buyer’s possession and for parking tickets, towing fees, storage fees, impound fees, and other similar charges incurred by the buyer for the motor vehicle while the motor vehicle was in the buyer’s possession.

In this section, “sales contract” includes an installment sales contract, a short-term sales contract, and a single-payment contract.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 171 SLA 2004; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (e) and (f) were enacted as (f) and (g), respectively.
Relettered in 2012, at which time subsection (e) was relettered as (g) and internal references in subsections (d) and (f) were conformed.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 27, 2012, in (c)(3), deleted “separate agreement, the” following “agreement provides that the” and “and any and all other conditions of the purchase” following “motor vehicle sales contract”; in (d), added “and if the motor vehicle dealer has delivered the motor vehicle to the buyer, the buyer shall deliver the motor vehicle to the motor vehicle dealer,” following “is not completed”, “less any amount owed to the motor vehicle dealer under (f) and (g) (now (e) and (f)) of this section,” following “entire down payment” , and added “trade-in” following “odometer from when the”; added (f) (now (e)) and (g) (now (f)).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 50, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply “to a motor vehicle sales contract or an agreement that is entered into on or after August 27, 2012.”

Sec. 45.25.620.
Service contracts.

A motor vehicle service contract must be in writing and contain all essential provisions regarding the administration of the contract.

If a service contract is included in a motor vehicle sale, the seller shall, before delivery of the motor vehicle, give to the buyer a written statement with all pertinent blank spaces filled in that shall be signed by both the buyer and seller and that clearly and conspicuously

explains the difference between a service contract and a warranty;

discloses the maker of or obligor on the service contract;

describes the relationship between the maker and the seller of the service contract;

for a vehicle that is a used vehicle, notifies the buyer that the seller may not disclaim implied warranties if the seller is the maker or obligor of the service contract; and

includes all other disclosures required by law.

A motor vehicle dealer may not disclaim or limit implied warranties for a motor vehicle for which the motor vehicle dealer is a maker of a service contract sold for that motor vehicle. However, a motor vehicle dealer may disclaim or limit implied warranties as otherwise allowed by law, regardless of the make or model of the motor vehicle, if the motor vehicle dealer is merely the seller, not the maker, of the service contract and does not otherwise extend any written warranties on the motor vehicle that is purchased.

In this section, “maker” means the person that makes, frames, and executes a service contract and assumes any obligation due to the buyer, but does not include a motor vehicle dealer who merely sells the service contract as the agent of a service contract company doing business in this state.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 12 ch 50 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective August 27, 2012, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which addressed the difference between an application for a service contract and a service contract.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 50, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendments to this section apply “to a motor vehicle service contract entered into on or after August 27, 2012.”

Sec. 45.25.630.
Discharged amounts in motor vehicle leases.

Notwithstanding another provision of law to the contrary, if the amount to be paid by a lessee under a motor vehicle lease includes a discharged amount, the inclusion of the discharged amount in the amount to be paid under the lease is not a loan of the discharged amount and is not subject to any law that regulates the disclosure of interest, the charging of interest, the amount of interest rates, or the lending of money.

In this section, “discharged amount” means the amount, if any, that the lessor agrees to pay to discharge an outstanding obligation of the lessee under an existing motor vehicle agreement, loan, installment sales contract, or lease.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 2006)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 67, SLA 2006, which enacted this section, took effect on September 13, 2006.